Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The amounts authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for  issuance of gen-
eral obligation bonds of the state during the 2025-2027 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Clackamas Community College,
Center for Excellence for
Farming, Horticulture and
Wildland Fire .......................... $ 8,085,000
(b) Klamath Community College,
Cosmetology ADA
Remediation............................ $ 4,045,000
(c) Mt. Hood Community College,
Classroom and Lab
Renovations ............................ $ 8,085,000
(d) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building...... $ 7,985,000
(e) Southwestern Oregon
Community College, Student
Uplift and Collaboration
Create Expanded Support
Success ................................... $ 8,085,000
(f) Portland State University,
Portland Center for the
Performing Arts Academic
Building................................... $ 85,660,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 1
(g) University of Oregon, Child
Behavioral Health Building..... $ 17,920,000
(h) Southern Oregon University,
Creative Industries/Student
Success ................................... $ 2,485,000
(i) Western Oregon University,
Data Center ............................ $ 715,000
(2) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) ......... $ 100,910,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) .......... $ 50,580,000
(4) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) .............................. $ 50,455,000
(5) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Housing and Community
Services Department:
(A) Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Affordable
Rental Housing Program ........ $ 468,220,000
(B) Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Homeownership
Program.................................. $ 100,910,000
(C) Permanent Supportive
Housing Program.................... $ 80,760,000
(b) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvement and
Renewal .................................. $ 50,455,000
(B) Computerized Maintenance
Management System ............... $ 2,285,000
(C) Institution Staff Deployment
System Replacement (ISDS) ... $ 625,000
(D) Wireless Communication
System .................................... $ 13,040,000
(c) State Forestry Department:
(A) Klamath Fire Cache
Warehouse Replacement ........ $ 1,723,800
(B) Santiam Facility Replacement,
Phase I.................................... $ 1,115,400
(C) State Forester, Office
Building Restoration............... $ 520,200
(D) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase III ................................. $ 2,542,388
(E) Veneta Campus Remodel ........ $ 4,404,427
(d) State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
(A) Capital Improvements,
Hatchery Facilities ................. $ 20,180,000
(B) North Willamette Watershed
District Office ......................... $ 5,320,000
(e) Oregon Health Authority,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 2
Oregon State Hospital
Capital Improvements
and Equipment........................ $ 7,545,000
(f) Judicial Department,
Morrow County Courthouse ... $ 2,535,000
(g) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Medford Field Maintenance
Shop........................................ $ 6,680,000
(B) Klamath Falls Readiness
Center..................................... $ 2,035,000
(C) Linn County Readiness
Center..................................... $ 7,080,000
(h) Department of State Police:
(A) Area Command Center
Property Acquisition............... $ 3,540,000
(B) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ..................... $ 7,360,000
(i) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Capital Improvements,
All Facilities ........................... $ 5,070,000
(B) CCTV and Access Control
Improvement, Phase IV .......... $ 5,630,000
(C) JJIS IT System
Modernization......................... $ 12,295,000
(D) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation and
Expansion ............................... $ 2,735,000
(E) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation.............................. $ 8,960,000
(F) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations ............................ $ 4,045,000
(G) Oak Creek Youth Correctional
Facility.................................... $ 4,045,000
(H) Tillamook Dorm Renovation ... $ 12,015,000
(I) Tillamook Medical and Dental
Renovations ............................ $ 825,000
(j) Department of Public Safety
Standards and Training:
(A) Learning Management
System .................................... $ 3,510,000
(B) Deferred Maintenance ............ $ 3,280,000
(k) Department of Environmental
Quality, Laboratory and
Monitoring Equipment............ $ 1,350,000
(L) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ..... $ 120,930,000
(B) University of Oregon, Child
Behavioral Health Building..... $ 35,855,000
(C) Southern Oregon University,
Creative Industries/Student
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 3
Success ................................... $ 38,470,000
(D) Western Oregon University,
Data Center ............................ $ 12,555,000
(m) State Department of
Agriculture, Project
OneODA .................................. $ 6,185,000
(n) Oregon Public Defense
Commission, Financial Case
Management System ............... $ 13,915,000
(o) Department of Justice, Legal
Tools Replacement System 3.0 $ 13,455,000
(p) Department of Revenue,
Electronic Valuation
Information System ................ $ 2,035,000
(q) Oregon Department of Emergency
Management, Resiliency Grant
Fund established under
ORS 401.552............................. $ 10,140,000
(r) Oregon Business Development
Department, Coos Bay Channel
Modification............................ $ 100,815,000
(6) Department of
Transportation (Art. XI,
section 7), Interstate 5
Bridge Replacement Project ... $ 251,825,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) .................. $ 116,000,000
(8) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University,
Portland Center for the
Performing Arts Parking
Structure ................................ $ 53,010,000
(b) Portland State University,
Student Housing ..................... $ 85,660,000
(9) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ................. $ 20,080,000
(10) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ........................... $ 50,000,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
Labor and Industries Building
Renovation and Seismic
Upgrade................................... $ 126,080,000
(b) State Forestry Department:
(A) Klamath Fire Cache Warehouse
Replacement ........................... $ 3,346,200
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 4
(B) Santiam Facility Replacement,
Phase I.................................... $ 3,954,600
(C) State Forester, Office
Building Restoration............... $ 1,009,800
(D) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase III ................................. $ 3,532,612
(E) Veneta Campus Remodel ........ $ 6,430,573
(c) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(A) Department of Veterans’
Affairs Salem HVAC
Controls Replacement,
Phase II .................................. $ 1,585,000
(B) Department of Veterans’
Affairs Salem Roof
Replacement ........................... $ 1,230,000
(d) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
(A) Liquor Warehouse Management
Management IT System .......... $ 8,090,000
(B) Liquor Warehouse Conveyor
System .................................... $ 10,125,000
(C) Liquor Warehouse Land
and Building............................ $ 46,330,000
Total General Obligation
Bonds...................................... $2,340,290,000
SECTION 2. The amounts authorized, as provided  by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of re-
venue bonds of the state during the 2025-2027 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 500,000,000
Department of Transportation,
Highway User Tax ................. $ 850,000,000
Department of Transportation,
Grant Anticipation Revenue
Vehicle .................................. $ 345,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department ........................... $ 30,000,000
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 494,515,200
Total Direct Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,219,515,200
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 600,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 5
Program ................................ $ 2,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority .. $ 1,000,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department.............  $ 1,300,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,902,000,000
Total Revenue Bonds ............ $ 5,121,515,200
SECTION 3. The amount authorized, as  provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of cer-
tificates of participation and other financing agreements  of the state during the 2025-2027
biennium for the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is $13,037,910.
SECTION 4. (1) For calendar year 2026, the amount of $550,336,540  is allocated for private
activity bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds................... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program .................................... $ 1,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ................. $450,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee................................. $ 59,336,540
(2) For calendar  year 2027, the amount of $550,336,540 is allocated for private activity
bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds................... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program .................................... $ 1,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ................. $450,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee................................. $ 59,336,540
(3) If an increase in this state’s population, a sufficient increase in the Consumer Price
Index or a change in federal law allows the private activity bond limit  as set by the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,  to exceed $550,336,540 during the 2026 calendar year or
$550,336,540 during the 2027 calendar year, the increase is allocated to the  Private Activity
Bond Committee.
SECTION 5.
Section 5, chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
SECTION 6. (1) For purposes of Article XI-F(1), section 1, of  the Oregon Constitution,
the Legislative Assembly determines that the projects  authorized to be financed pursuant to
section 1 (8) of this 2025 Act with bonds issued under Article XI-F(1) of the Oregon  Consti-
tution will benefit higher education institutions or activities.
(2) For purposes of Article  XI-G, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution, the Legislative
Assembly determines that the projects authorized  to be financed pursuant to section 1 (1)
of this 2025 Act  with bonds issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution will benefit
higher education institutions or activities or community colleges authorized by law to receive
state aid.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 6
SECTION 7. Bonds authorized pursuant to  Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution under
section 1 (1) of this 2025 Act for the benefit of a constructing  authority may not be issued
until the constructing authority certifies  that the constructing authority has matching funds
available for the same or similar purposes as the bonds, that the matching  funds are not
proceeds of indebtedness incurred by the state under any other article of the Oregon Con-
stitution, and that the matching funds are available  to the constructing authority in an
amount at least equal to the amount of indebtedness incurred by  the state through the is-
suance of the bonds.
SECTION 8.
(1) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (5)(f) of this 2025  Act, the State
Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount  not to exceed $2,500,000 of net pro-
ceeds for the purposes and in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705, Oregon  Laws
2013, plus an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(2) For purposes of sections 8 and 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section  64,
chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,  bonds issued pursuant to this section are considered to be
bonds issued pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013.
(3) Bonds may not be issued pursuant to section 1  (5)(f) of this 2025 Act except as pro-
vided in this section.
SECTION 9. (1) A community college for  which a project to be funded with general obli-
gation bonds authorized to be issued  under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution is ap-
proved in this 2025 Act may not request approval for an additional project to  be funded with
general obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitu-
tion until the beginning of the regular session of the Legislative Assembly held in 2029, un-
less the community college withdraws the project approved under this 2025 Act.
(2) For biennia beginning on or after July 1, 2025, the  aggregate amount authorized for
issuance of general obligation bonds under Article XI-G of the Oregon  Constitution for
projects at a single community college may not exceed $12 million.
SECTION 10.
 Section 10, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  Notwithstanding any provision of law:
(1) General obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article  XI-G of the Oregon Consti-
tution prior to January 1, 2013,  for community college projects must be issued not later than June
30, 2015. Project approvals for general obligation bonds authorized  to be issued under Article XI-G
of the Oregon Constitution prior to January  1, 2013, for community college projects, expire on June
30, 2015.
(2) A community  college may not have more than one project approved for funding with general
obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution  that is
awaiting matching funds, other than projects approved prior to January 1, 2013.
(3) A community college for which a project to be funded with general  obligation bonds au-
thorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon  Constitution is approved in [ this 2013 Act ]
chapter 705,  Oregon Laws 2013,  may not request approval of an additional project to be funded
with general obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G of  the Oregon Constitution
until the beginning of the regular session of the Legislative Assembly held in 2017, unless the  com-
munity college withdraws the project approved under [ this 2013 Act ] chapter 705,  Oregon Laws
2013.
[(4) For biennia beginning on or after July 1, 2015, the aggregate amount  authorized for issuance
of general obligation  bonds under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution for projects at a single
community college may not exceed $8 million. ]
SECTION 11. Bonds authorized pursuant to Article XI-Q of  the Oregon Constitution un-
der section 1 (5)(r)  of this 2025 Act for the Coos Bay Channel Modification may not be issued
until the Oregon Business Development  Department certifies that the constructing authority
has met the following conditions:
(1) An environmental impact statement for the project has  been completed and a final
record of decision has been issued according to the National Environmental Policy Act; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 7
(2) The Oregon International Port of Coos Bay,  or a private entity engaged in a public-
private partnership with the port, has closed  on a Railroad Rehabilitation and Improvement
Financing loan through the Build America Bureau within the United States Department of
Transportation in the amount of  at least $1 billion or has secured equivalent levels of alter-
native funding through other federal grants or loans.
SECTION 12. (1) A public university that is carrying out a qualified project shall require
each contractor in a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent of the  work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform under the contract, in a manner  consistent with the
apprentices’ respective apprenticeship training programs;
(b) Establish and execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of  women, mi-
nority individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract, with the  aspirational
target of having at least 15 percent of total  work hours performed by individuals in one or
more of those groups;
(c) Provide health insurance and retirement benefits to workers employed  by the con-
tractor; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by  the contractor to abide by the requirements
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if the work  to be performed under
the subcontract has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
(2) On or before February 1 of each year, each public university that is carrying out  a
qualified project shall  report to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means or Joint Interim
Committee on Ways and Means, as part of the report required under ORS 350.379, on:
(a) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by apprentices;
(b) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by women,  minority individuals
and veterans; and
(c) The types and  costs of health insurance and retirement benefits provided to workers
by contractors and subcontractors.
(3) The requirements of this section are in addition to, and  not in lieu of, the require-
ments imposed under ORS 350.379.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program”  means the total system of apprenticeship that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s registered standards  and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Qualified project” means the following capital construction projects:
(A) The Portland State University Portland Center for the Performing Arts Academic
Building referenced in section 1 (1)(f) of this 2025 Act;
(B) The University of Oregon Child Behavioral  Health Building project referenced in
section 1 (1)(g) of this 2025 Act;
(C) The Southern Oregon University Creative  Industries/Student Success project refer-
enced in section 1 (1)(h) of this 2025 Act; and
(D) The Western Oregon  University Data Center project referenced in section 1 (1)(i) of
this 2025 Act.
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(g) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 13.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 8
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 9